Massachusetts, session 194th, S2010.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause Eighteenth A of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “or”, in
line 563, the following words:- one year after.
SECTION 2. Clause Forty-first A of said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 1225, the following words:- one
year after.
of 1